District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.31

Establishment of AccessRx for uninsured District residents.

The Department shall conduct a program to negotiate low-cost prescription and nonprescription drugs, medications, and medical supplies for uninsured District residents (“AccessRx for uninsured”). The Director shall provide sufficient personnel to ensure efficient administration of the program. The extent and magnitude of the program shall be determined by the Director on the basis of the calculated need of the recipient population and available funds.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 131, 51 DCR 3688